test/src/morphology/N-kep_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kep: # Noun 61 'eng /est kepp/fin' - full paradigm
     kep+N+Sg+Nom: kep
     kep+N+Sg+Gen: kep
     kep+N+Sg+Par: keppõ
     kep+N+Sg+Dat: keppõn
     kep+N+Sg+Ins: keppõks
     kep+N+Sg+Ill: keppõ
     kep+N+Sg+Ela: kepstõ
     kep+N+Pl+Nom: kepīd
     kep+N+Pl+Gen: kepīd
     kep+N+Pl+Par: kepīdi
     kep+N+Pl+Dat: kepīdõn
     kep+N+Pl+Ins: kepīdõks
     kep+N+Pl+Ill: kepīž
     kep+N+Pl+Ela: kepīst
